Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1326
Transfer of sounds; violations; penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of section 28-1323 or 28-1324 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 310.